Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF424.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16C.067] PREFERRED MINERALS AND METALS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin As used in this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) "minerals and metals" or "minerals or metals" means one or more of the following: nickel, copper, cobalt, steel, or iron powder; and new text end new text begin (2) "goods" means solar panels and batteries in electric vehicles. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin State contracting. new text end new text begin Before a commissioner or other agency head enters into a contract for the purchase of goods, the commissioner or agency head must require that the vendor of the goods disclose whether the goods contain, or have any components that contain, minerals or metals and state where those minerals and metals were mined or produced and, if applicable, who the manufacturer is. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Disclosure to legislature. new text end new text begin If a vendor discloses that its goods or any components of its goods contain minerals or metals that do not come from Minnesota, the commissioner or agency head must promptly report to the chairs of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over mining that the commissioner or agency head is entering into a contract for goods containing minerals and metals not from Minnesota. The commissioner or agency head must detail efforts made to obtain the goods from vendors that contain, or have components that contain, minerals and metals from Minnesota and a rationalization for the decision to contract for goods that contain minerals and metals from outside the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant recipients use of state funds. new text end new text begin If a recipient of a state grant uses state grant proceeds to purchase goods, the recipient must disclose to the agency serving as the fiscal agent whether the goods contain, or have any components that contain, any amount of minerals or metals and state where those minerals and metals were mined or produced and, if applicable, who the manufacturer is. The commissioner or agency head of the agency serving as the fiscal agent for the grant must promptly report to the chairs of the committees in the senate and the house of representatives with jurisdiction over mining regarding state funds used to purchase goods or components of goods containing minerals or metals mined or produced outside the state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end